test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-simplex_kene_gt-norm.yaml
     #
     samune+Pron+Sg+Nom: samune
     samune+Pron+Sg+Gen: samuse
     samune+Pron+Sg+Par: samust
     samune+Pron+Sg+Ill: samusesse
     samune+Pron+Sg+Ine: samuses
     samune+Pron+Sg+Ela: samusest
     samune+Pron+Sg+All: samusele
     samune+Pron+Sg+Ade: samusel
     samune+Pron+Sg+Abl: samuselt
     samune+Pron+Sg+Tra: samuseks
     samune+Pron+Sg+Trm: samuseni
     samune+Pron+Sg+Ess: samusena
     samune+Pron+Sg+Abe: samuseta
     samune+Pron+Sg+Com: samusega
     samune+Pron+Pl+Nom: samused
     samune+Pron+Pl+Gen: samuste
     samune+Pron+Pl+Par: samuseid
     samune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [samustesse, samuseisse]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [samustes, samuseis]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [samustest, samuseist]
     samune+Pron+Pl+All: [samustele, samuseile]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [samustel, samuseil]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [samustelt, samuseilt]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [samusteks, samuseiks]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Trm: [samusteni, samuseini]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Ess: [samustena, samuseina]
     samune+Pron+Pl+Abe: samusteta
     samune+Pron+Pl+Com: samustega
     #
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Nom: mihuke
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Gen: mihukese
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Par: mihukest
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mihukesesse, mihukesse]
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Ine: mihukeses
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Ela: mihukesest
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+All: mihukesele
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Ade: mihukesel
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Abl: mihukeselt
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Tra: mihukeseks
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Trm: mihukeseni
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Ess: mihukesena
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Abe: mihukeseta
     mihuke+Pron+Sg+Com: mihukesega
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Nom: mihukesed
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Gen: mihukeste
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Par: mihukesi
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mihukestesse, mihukesisse]
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mihukestes, mihukesis]
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mihukestest, mihukesist]
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+All: [mihukestele, mihukesile]
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mihukestel, mihukesil]
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mihukestelt, mihukesilt]
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mihukesteks, mihukesiks]
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Trm: mihukesteni
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Ess: mihukestena
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Abe: mihukesteta
     mihuke+Pron+Pl+Com: mihukestega
     #
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Nom: mihukene
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Gen: mihukese
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Par: mihukest
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mihukesesse, mihukesse]
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Ine: mihukeses
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Ela: mihukesest
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+All: mihukesele
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Ade: mihukesel
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Abl: mihukeselt
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Tra: mihukeseks
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Trm: mihukeseni
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Ess: mihukesena
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Abe: mihukeseta
     mihukene+Pron+Sg+Com: mihukesega
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Nom: mihukesed
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Gen: mihukeste
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Par: mihukesi
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mihukestesse, mihukesisse]
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mihukestes, mihukesis]
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mihukestest, mihukesist]
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+All: [mihukestele, mihukesile]
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mihukestel, mihukesil]
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mihukestelt, mihukesilt]
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mihukesteks, mihukesiks]
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Trm: mihukesteni
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Ess: mihukestena
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Abe: mihukesteta
     mihukene+Pron+Pl+Com: mihukestega
     #
     milline+Pron+Sg+Nom: milline
     milline+Pron+Sg+Gen: millise
     milline+Pron+Sg+Par: millist
     milline+Pron+Sg+Ill: millisesse
     milline+Pron+Sg+Ine: millises
     milline+Pron+Sg+Ela: millisest
     milline+Pron+Sg+All: millisele
     milline+Pron+Sg+Ade: millisel
     milline+Pron+Sg+Abl: milliselt
     milline+Pron+Sg+Tra: milliseks
     milline+Pron+Sg+Trm: milliseni
     milline+Pron+Sg+Ess: millisena
     milline+Pron+Sg+Abe: milliseta
     milline+Pron+Sg+Com: millisega
     milline+Pron+Pl+Nom: millised
     milline+Pron+Pl+Gen: milliste
     milline+Pron+Pl+Par: milliseid
     milline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [millistesse, milliseisse]
     milline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [millistes, milliseis]
     milline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [millistest, milliseist]
     milline+Pron+Pl+All: [millistele, milliseile]
     milline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [millistel, milliseil]
     milline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [millistelt, milliseilt]
     milline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [millisteks, milliseiks]
     milline+Pron+Pl+Trm: millisteni
     milline+Pron+Pl+Ess: millistena
     milline+Pron+Pl+Abe: millisteta
     milline+Pron+Pl+Com: millistega
     #
     minake+Pron+Sg+Nom: minake
     minake+Pron+Sg+Gen: minakese
     minake+Pron+Sg+Par: minakest
     minake+Pron+Sg+Ill: [minakesesse, minakesse]
     minake+Pron+Sg+Ine: minakeses
     minake+Pron+Sg+Ela: minakesest
     minake+Pron+Sg+All: minakesele
     minake+Pron+Sg+Ade: minakesel
     minake+Pron+Sg+Abl: minakeselt
     minake+Pron+Sg+Tra: minakeseks
     minake+Pron+Sg+Trm: minakeseni
     minake+Pron+Sg+Ess: minakesena
     minake+Pron+Sg+Abe: minakeseta
     minake+Pron+Sg+Com: minakesega
     minake+Pron+Pl+Nom: minakesed
     minake+Pron+Pl+Gen: minakeste
     minake+Pron+Pl+Par: minakesi
     minake+Pron+Pl+Ill: [minakestesse, minakesisse]
     minake+Pron+Pl+Ine: [minakestes, minakesis]
     minake+Pron+Pl+Ela: [minakestest, minakesist]
     minake+Pron+Pl+All: [minakestele, minakesile]
     minake+Pron+Pl+Ade: [minakestel, minakesil]
     minake+Pron+Pl+Abl: [minakestelt, minakesilt]
     minake+Pron+Pl+Tra: [minakesteks, minakesiks]
     minake+Pron+Pl+Trm: minakesteni
     minake+Pron+Pl+Ess: minakestena
     minake+Pron+Pl+Abe: minakesteta
     minake+Pron+Pl+Com: minakestega
     #
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Nom: minakene
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Gen: minakese
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Par: minakest
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [minakesesse, minakesse]
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Ine: minakeses
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Ela: minakesest
     minakene+Pron+Sg+All: minakesele
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Ade: minakesel
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Abl: minakeselt
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Tra: minakeseks
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Trm: minakeseni
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Ess: minakesena
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Abe: minakeseta
     minakene+Pron+Sg+Com: minakesega
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Nom: minakesed
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Gen: minakeste
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Par: minakesi
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [minakestesse, minakesisse]
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [minakestes, minakesis]
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [minakestest, minakesist]
     minakene+Pron+Pl+All: [minakestele, minakesile]
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [minakestel, minakesil]
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [minakestelt, minakesilt]
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [minakesteks, minakesiks]
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Trm: minakesteni
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Ess: minakestena
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Abe: minakesteta
     minakene+Pron+Pl+Com: minakestega
     #
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Nom: misuke
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Gen: misukese
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Par: misukest
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Ill: [misukesesse, misukesse]
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Ine: misukeses
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Ela: misukesest
     misuke+Pron+Sg+All: misukesele
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Ade: misukesel
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Abl: misukeselt
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Tra: misukeseks
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Trm: misukeseni
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Ess: misukesena
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Abe: misukeseta
     misuke+Pron+Sg+Com: misukesega
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Nom: misukesed
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Gen: misukeste
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Par: misukesi
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Ill: [misukestesse, misukesisse]
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Ine: [misukestes, misukesis]
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Ela: [misukestest, misukesist]
     misuke+Pron+Pl+All: [misukestele, misukesile]
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Ade: [misukestel, misukesil]
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Abl: [misukestelt, misukesilt]
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Tra: [misukesteks, misukesiks]
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Trm: misukesteni
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Ess: misukestena
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Abe: misukesteta
     misuke+Pron+Pl+Com: misukestega
     #
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Nom: misukene
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Gen: misukese
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Par: misukest
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [misukesesse, misukesse]
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Ine: misukeses
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Ela: misukesest
     misukene+Pron+Sg+All: misukesele
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Ade: misukesel
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Abl: misukeselt
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Tra: misukeseks
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Trm: misukeseni
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Ess: misukesena
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Abe: misukeseta
     misukene+Pron+Sg+Com: misukesega
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Nom: misukesed
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Gen: misukeste
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Par: misukesi
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [misukestesse, misukesisse]
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [misukestes, misukesis]
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [misukestest, misukesist]
     misukene+Pron+Pl+All: [misukestele, misukesile]
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [misukestel, misukesil]
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [misukestelt, misukesilt]
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [misukesteks, misukesiks]
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Trm: misukesteni
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Ess: misukestena
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Abe: misukesteta
     misukene+Pron+Pl+Com: misukestega
     #
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Nom: mõningane
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Gen: mõningase
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Par: mõningast
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mõningasesse, mõningasse]
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Ine: mõningases
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Ela: mõningasest
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+All: mõningasele
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Ade: mõningasel
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Abl: mõningaselt
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Tra: mõningaseks
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Trm: mõningaseni
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Ess: mõningasena
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Abe: mõningaseta
     mõningane+Pron+Sg+Com: mõningasega
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Nom: mõningased
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Gen: mõningaste
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Par: mõningasi
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mõningastesse, mõningasisse]
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mõningastes, mõningasis]
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mõningastest, mõningasist]
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+All: [mõningastele, mõningasile]
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mõningastel, mõningasil]
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mõningastelt, mõningasilt]
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mõningasteks, mõningasiks]
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Trm: mõningasteni
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Ess: mõningastena
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Abe: mõningasteta
     mõningane+Pron+Pl+Com: mõningastega
     #
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Nom: mäherdune
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Gen: mäherduse
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Par: mäherdust
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mäherdusesse, mäherdusse]
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Ine: mäherduses
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Ela: mäherdusest
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+All: mäherdusele
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Ade: mäherdusel
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Abl: mäherduselt
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Tra: mäherduseks
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Trm: mäherduseni
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Ess: mäherdusena
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Abe: mäherduseta
     mäherdune+Pron+Sg+Com: mäherdusega
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Nom: mäherdused
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Gen: mäherduste
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Par: mäherdusi
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mäherdustesse, mäherdusisse]
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [mäherdustes, mäherdusis]
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [mäherdustest, mäherdusist]
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+All: [mäherdustele, mäherdusile]
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [mäherdustel, mäherdusil]
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [mäherdustelt, mäherdusilt]
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [mäherdusteks, mäherdusiks]
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Trm: mäherdusteni
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Ess: mäherdustena
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Abe: mäherdusteta
     mäherdune+Pron+Pl+Com: mäherdustega
     #
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Nom: nihuke
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Gen: nihukese
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Par: nihukest
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Ill: [nihukesesse, nihukesse]
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Ine: nihukeses
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Ela: nihukesest
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+All: nihukesele
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Ade: nihukesel
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Abl: nihukeselt
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Tra: nihukeseks
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Trm: nihukeseni
